Hawaii, session 2026, GM1339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that public servants have
a unique and vital role in serving and protecting the well-being
of the people of the State by providing essential government
services and administering programs central to the functioning
of the State.
The legislature further finds that public servants, by
virtue of their official duties, are exposed to large segments
of the public and make decisions or take other actions that
affect many populations. This presents unique and heightened
safety risks that are not typically encountered in other
professions. National and local reports demonstrate a
significant and troubling rise in threats, harassment, and
violence directed toward public servants, often as a result of
decisions made in the performance of their official governmental
functions. The escalation of threats and other harassment of
public servants undermines the safety of public servants and the
public's trust in the institutions that serve them, resulting in
2026-2480 SB2568 CDl SMA.docx
imiiminiiiHiiiiiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO. S?,
C.D, 1
increased resignations of public servants, impaired service
delivery, and broader negative impacts on communities across the
State and the nation.
The legislature also finds that stronger statutory
protections are necessary to address harassment and threats that
interfere with the performance of official public duties.
Although existing laws provide several statutes that could apply
to threats and harassment against public servants, including
terroristic threatening, obstruction of justice, and obstructing
government operations, these offenses have proven difficult for
law enforcement to use effectively in cases involving
inappropriate communications, threats, or harassment directed at
public servants. Law enforcement often downgrades charges or
declines to pursue cases under these statutes due to the high
evidentiary burden or because the statutory elements do not
clearly fit the conduct at issue.
The legislature additionally finds that as a result, many
threats and harassing communications are instead charged under
the basic harassment statute, which is a petty misdemeanor and
requires only proof of intent to harass, annoy, or alarm. The
related offense of harassment by stalking applies if there is a
2026-2480 SB2568 CDl SMA.docx
HIIHIIIfflIIHIIIIIMIIIIin

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
pattern of conduct, and may be elevated to a class C felony for
repeat offenders. However, these existing penalties may not
provide a sufficient deterrent to harmful or disruptive behavior
targeting public servants performing their official duties,
particularly when the conduct undermtnes the integrity of
government proceedings or the safety of public officials.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide stronger
protections to safeguard public servants and the effective
functioning of government, by elevating the offense of
harassment to a misdemeanor when committed against a public
servant because of or during their performance of official
duties.
SECTION 2. Section 711-1106, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§711-1106 Harassment. (1) A person commits the offense
of harassment if, with intent to harass, annoy, or alarm any
other person, that person:
(a) Strikes, shoves, kicks, or otherwise touches another
person in an offensive manner or subjects the other
person to offensive physical contact;
2026-2480 SB2568 CDl SMA.docx 3
^uiiinisKtiiiuiniuimiiu

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) Insults, taunts, or challenges another person in a
manner likely to provoke an immediate violent response
or that would cause the other person to reasonably
believe that the actor intends to cause bodily injury
to the recipient or another or damage to the property
of the recipient or another;
Repeatedly makes telephone calls, facsimile
transmissions, or any form of electronic communication
as defined in section 711-1111(2), including
electronic mail transmissions, without purpose of
legitimate communication;
(d) Repeatedly makes a communication anonymously or at an
extremely inconvenient hour;
Repeatedly makes communications, after being advised
by the person to whom the communication is directed
that further communication is unwelcome; or
Makes a communication using offensively coarse
language that would cause the recipient to reasonably
believe that the actor intends to cause bodily injury
to the recipient or another or damage to the property
of the recipient or another.
2026-2480 SB2568 CDl SMA.docx 4

Page 5
S.B. NO.
2^1
■ h.D. 2
C.D. 1
(2) Harassment is a petty misdemeanor [-?-], except as
provided in subsection (3) .
(3) Harassment is a misdemeanor if committed against a
public servant because of or while the public servant is
performing official duties.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "public servant" has
the same meaning as in section 710-1000."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2480 SB2568 CDl SMA.docx
llllillHIIHIIIIIIIIllllHII

S.B. NO. E
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 13th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2568, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
56-26

SB No. 2568, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives